Vermont, session 2025-2026, H160.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 106 is added to read:
CHAPTER 106. RIGHT TO REPAIR
Subchapter 1. Medical Devices
§ 4049. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Authorized repair provider” means an individual or business
that has an arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer under which
VT LEG #380003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.160
2025 Page 2 of 7
the original equipment manufacturer grants to the individual or business a
license to use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the
purposes of offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
medical equipment under the name of the original equipment manufacturer or
other arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer to offer such
services on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer.
(B) An original equipment manufacturer that offers the services of
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of its own medical equipment shall be
considered an authorized repair provider with respect to such equipment.
(2) “Documentation” means any manual, diagram, reporting output,
service code description, schematic diagram, security code, password, or other
guidance or information, whether in an electronic or tangible format, used to
perform the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of medical
equipment.
(3) “Fair and reasonable terms” means making available parts, tools, or
documentation as follows:
(A) with respect to documentation required for repair, that
documentation is provided by the OEM at no charge, except that, when the
documentation is requested in physical printed form, a charge may be included
for the reasonable actual costs of preparing and sending the copy;
VT LEG #380003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.160
2025 Page 3 of 7
(B) with respect to tools, that tools are made available by the OEM at
no charge and without requiring authorization or internet access for use or
operation of the tool, or imposing impediments to access or use of the tool to
diagnose, maintain, or repair and enable full functionality of medical
equipment, except that when a tool is requested in physical form, a charge may
be included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool;
and
(C) with respect to parts, that parts are made available by the OEM,
either directly or indirectly through an authorized repair provider, to
independent repair providers and health care facilities at reasonable costs and
terms that are equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms under which an
OEM offers the part to an authorized repair provider and that:
(i) account for any discount, rebate, convenient and timely means
of delivery, means of enabling fully restored and updated functionality, rights
of use, or other incentive or preference the OEM offers to an authorized repair
provider, or any additional cost, burden, or impediment the OEM imposes on
an independent repair provider or health care facility;
(ii) are not conditioned on or imposing a substantial obligation or
restriction that is not reasonably necessary for enabling the independent repair
provider or health care facility to engage in the diagnosis, maintenance, or
repair of medical equipment made by or on behalf of the OEM; and
VT LEG #380003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.160
2025 Page 4 of 7
(iii) are not conditioned on an arrangement described in
subdivision (1)(A) of this section.
(4) “Health care facility” means all persons or institutions, including
mobile facilities, whether public or private, proprietary or not for profit, that
offer diagnosis, treatment, inpatient, or ambulatory care to two or more
unrelated persons, and the buildings in which those services are offered. The
term shall not apply to any facility operated by religious groups relying solely
on spiritual means through prayer or healing but includes all institutions
included in 18 V.S.A. § 9432(8), except health maintenance organizations.
(5) “Independent repair provider” means a person operating in this State,
who does not have an arrangement with an OEM as described in subdivision
(1)(A) of this section, and who is engaged in the diagnosis, service,
maintenance, or repair of medical equipment.
(6) “Medical equipment” or “equipment” means any powered device
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that is used in
the treatment, monitoring, or diagnosis of a patient, and includes assistive,
adaptive, and rehabilitative devices.
(7) “Original equipment manufacturer” or “OEM” means a business
engaged in the business of selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying new medical
equipment manufactured by or on behalf of itself.
VT LEG #380003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.160
2025 Page 5 of 7
(8) “Part” means any replacement part, either used or new, made
available by an OEM for purposes of effecting the services of maintenance or
repair of medical equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, sold or
otherwise supplied by, the OEM.
(9) “Tools” means any software program, service key, hardware
implement, or other apparatus used for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
medical equipment, including software or other mechanisms that provision,
program, or pair a new part; facilitate access to the equipment’s repair and
diagnostic functions; calibrate functionality; or perform any other function
required to bring the product back to fully functional condition, including any
updates.
(10) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as provided in 18 U.S.C.
§ 1839.
§ 4050. REQUIREMENTS
(a) General requirements. For medical equipment and parts sold and used
in this State, the OEM of the equipment or parts or an authorized repair
provider shall make available to independent repair providers and health care
facilities, on fair and reasonable terms, any:
(1) documentation, parts, and tools, required for the diagnosis,
maintenance, or repair of medical equipment and parts for medical equipment,
inclusive of any updates to information; and
VT LEG #380003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.160
2025 Page 6 of 7
(2) training courses and materials on the operation, inspection,
diagnosis, maintenance, and repair of the equipment that the OEM similarly
provides to authorized repair providers.
(b) Security lock access. For medical equipment sold and used in this State
that contains an electronic security lock or other security-related function, the
OEM of the equipment or parts or an authorized repair provider shall make
available to independent repair providers and health care facilities, on fair and
reasonable terms, special documentation, tools, and parts required to access
and reset the lock or function when disabled in the course of diagnosis,
maintenance, or repair of such equipment. The documentation, tools, and parts
may be made available through appropriate secure release systems.
§ 4051. LIMITATIONS
(a) This subchapter does not require an OEM to divulge a trade secret to an
independent repair provider or health care facility.
(b) This subchapter does not alter the terms of any arrangement described
in subdivision 4049(1)(A) of this title in force between an authorized repair
provider and an OEM, including the performance or provision of warranty or
recall repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an OEM
pursuant to such arrangement, except that any provision governing such an
arrangement that purports to waive, avoid, restrict, or limit the OEM’s
obligations to comply with this subchapter is void and unenforceable.
VT LEG #380003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.160
2025 Page 7 of 7
(c) Original equipment manufacturers and authorized repair providers are
not liable for damage caused to any medical equipment by independent repair
providers or health care facilities that occurs during the course of repair,
diagnosis, or maintenance of the equipment.
§ 4052. ENFORCEMENT
(a) A person who violates a provision of this subchapter commits an unfair
and deceptive act in trade and commerce in violation of section 2453 of this
title.
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct
civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil
actions as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION
This act applies to medical equipment and parts sold or in use in this State
on or after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380003 v.1